Utah statutes.
58-63-308.   Evidence of licensure.

An individual licensed as an armed private security officer, armored car security officer, or unarmed private security officer shall:

(1)  carry a copy of the individual's license on the individual's person at all times while acting as a licensee; and

(2)  display the license upon the request of a peace officer, a representative of the division, or a member of the public.



Amended by Chapter 246, 2008 General Session

